Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5802YH (4) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2225 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.12R New graduate nonresident 1 tuition tax credit. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âHealth care professionalâ means an individual who is 4 licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by 5 the law of this state to administer health care in the ordinary 6 course of business or in the practice of a profession. 7 b. âInstitutionâ means an institution of higher education 8 governed by the board of regents. 9 c. âLicensed veterinarianâ means a person who is validly and 10 currently licensed to practice veterinary medicine in the state 11 of Iowa. 12 d. âNew graduateâ means an individual who is a graduate 13 of an institution within three years of first claiming the 14 nonresident tuition tax credit, who has been a resident of and 15 employed in this state since graduating, and who is employed as 16 a health care professional, teacher, licensed veterinarian, or 17 professional engineer in this state. 18 e. âProfessional engineerâ means an individual engaged in 19 the practice of engineering as defined in section 542B.2 who is 20 issued a certificate of licensure as a professional engineer 21 pursuant to section 542B.17. 22 f. âTeacherâ means a teacher licensed under chapter 256. 23 2. a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the 24 credits allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by 25 a new graduate nonresident tuition tax credit equal to one 26 hundred percent of the difference between the base tuition 27 paid by a new graduate as a nonresident student enrolled at 28 an institution and the base tuition amount paid by a resident 29 student at the same institution for the same school year during 30 the years of attendance by the new graduate. 31 b. The board of regents shall post on the board of regentsâ 32 internet site the base tuition amounts for nonresident and 33 resident students at each institution from at least the 34 previous ten-year period. 35 -1- LSB 5802YH (4) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2225 3. Any new graduate nonresident tuition tax credit in excess 1 of the tax liability is not refundable. Any credit in excess 2 of the tax liability for the tax year may be credited to the tax 3 liability for the following five tax years or until depleted, 4 whichever is the earlier. However, any credit in excess of tax 5 liability shall not be credited to or deplete tax liability on 6 the return of a nonresident. 7 4. Married taxpayers electing to file separate returns or 8 filing separately on a combined return may avail themselves of 9 the new graduate nonresident tuition tax credit by allocating 10 the new graduate nonresident tuition tax credit to each spouse 11 in the proportion that each spouseâs respective earned income 12 bears to the total combined earned income. 13 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 14 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 15 or after that date. 16